Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201379-2104.01
Learning community
coordinating council; advisory committee; members; duties.

Each
learning community coordinating council shall have an advisory committee composed
of the superintendent from each member school district or his or her representative. The
advisory committee shall:

(1) Review
issues related to open enrollment;

(2) Review proposals for focus programs,
focus schools, magnet schools, and pathways;

(3) Provide recommendations
for improving academic achievement across the learning community;

(4) Provide
recommendations for improving the learning community's diversity plan;

(5) Submit
a plan to the learning community coordinating council providing for the implementation
and administration of early childhood education programs for children in poverty;
and

(6) Provide input to the learning community coordinating council
on other issues as requested.

Laws 2008, LB1154, § 19;

Laws 2013, LB585, § 4.